Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Economic Development Programs and Tax Incentives Evaluation Act of 2014

§ 57-13-101.
Short title.

Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109 shall be known and may be cited as the “Economic Development Programs and Tax Incentives Evaluation Act of 2014.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-13-103.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

The State of Mississippi relies on a number of tax incentives, including credits, exemptions, and deductions, and economic development programs that utilize the proceeds of state general obligation bonds to encourage businesses to locate, hire employees, expand, invest, and/or remain in the state;

These various tax incentives and economic development programs are intended as a tool for economic development, promoting new jobs and business growth in Mississippi;

The state needs a systematic approach for evaluating whether incentives are fulfilling their intended purposes in a cost-effective manner;

In order to improve state government’s effectiveness in serving the residents of this state, the Legislature finds it necessary to provide for the systematic and comprehensive analysis of economic development tax incentives and economic development programs, and for those analyses to be incorporated into the budget and policymaking processes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-13-105.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109:

“Economic development tax incentive” includes those tax credits, deductions, exemptions, exclusions, and other preferential tax benefits or incentives enacted before or after July 1, 2014, for the purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses in the State of Mississippi.

“Economic development program” includes those statutory economic development programs that utilize the proceeds of state general obligation bonds for the purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses in the State of Mississippi.

In determining whether a tax incentive or economic development program is or was enacted for “the purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses,” the University Research Center shall consider legislative intent, including legislative statements of purpose and goals, and may also consider whether the tax incentive or program is promoted as a business incentive by the Mississippi Development Authority or other state agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-13-107.
Schedule for analysis of economic development tax incentives and economic development programs.

In accordance with the following schedule, the tax expenditure report produced by the University Research Center pursuant to Section 57-13-47, shall include an additional component, consistent with Section 57-13-109 and produced in consultation with the Director of the Mississippi Development Authority containing the following:

Analyses of economic development tax incentives and economic development programs as enacted prior to July 1, 2014, shall be completed by December 31, 2015, and no less than once every four (4) years thereafter;

Analyses of any economic development tax incentives and economic development programs created after July 1, 2014, shall be completed within five (5) years of taking effect, and no less than once every four (4) years thereafter.

Not later than the first of February each year beginning with 2016, the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee shall consider the tax expenditure report and hold at least one public hearing to deliberate the results of the analysis required in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-13-109.
Content of analyses of tax incentives and economic development programs.

The analysis of tax incentives as required by Section 57-13-107 shall include, but not be limited to:

A baseline assessment of the tax incentive, including, if applicable, the number of aggregate jobs committed and created with the taxpayers receiving such tax incentive;

The statutory and programmatic goals and intent of the tax incentive, if the goals and intentions are included in the incentive’s enabling legislation;

The number of taxpayers granted the tax incentive during the previous twelve-month period;

The value of the tax incentive granted, and ultimately claimed, listed by the North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS) Code associated with the taxpayers receiving the benefit, if the NAICS Code is available;

An estimate of the number of jobs that were the direct and indirect result of the incentive;

An estimate of the revenues that were the direct and indirect result of the incentive;

In the case of economic development tax incentives where measuring the economic impact is significantly limited due to data constraints, provide a description of the limitations on the data used and whether any changes in statute would facilitate data collection in a way that would allow for better analysis;

The methodology and assumptions used in carrying out the assessments, projections and analyses required pursuant to this subsection.

When an incentive comparative analysis is conducted on behalf of the state, a final copy shall be submitted to the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee and Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee and also submitted with copies of this report.

The analysis of economic development programs as required by Section 57-13-107 shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the impact of the program which shall include a calculation of the costs related to the assistance provided under the program and corresponding benefits to the state derived from economic development related to the program, including, but not limited to, capital investment, job creation, job retention and/or increased tax revenue.

All departments, offices, boards, and agencies of the state shall cooperate with the University Research Center and shall provide to the University Research Center any records, information (documentary and otherwise), data and data analysis as may be necessary to complete the analysis required by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014.